Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-7] Effect of recognition of
foreign-country judgment. If the court in a proceeding under section 658F-6
finds that the foreign-country judgment is entitled to recognition under this
chapter then, to the extent that the foreign-country judgment grants or denies
recovery of a sum of money, the foreign-country judgment is:

(1) Conclusive between the parties to the same extent
as the judgment of a sister state entitled to full faith and credit in this
State would be conclusive; and

(2) Enforceable in the same manner and to the same
extent as a judgment rendered in this State. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next